test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-yibye_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - и: # Noun 'mind, meaning' - partial paradigm /Type 7/
     и+N+Sg+Nom: и
     и+N+Sg+Acc: имʼ
     и+N+Sg+Gen: иʼ
     и+N+Sg+Dat: инʼ
     и+N+Sg+Loc: [ихина, ихиня]
     и+N+Sg+Abl: ихид
     и+N+Sg+Pros: [ивна, ивня]
     и+N+Du+Nom: ихиʼ
     и+N+Du+Acc: ихиʼ
     и+N+Du+Gen: ихиʼ
     и+N+Pl+Nom: иˮ
     и+N+Pl+Acc: ибе
     и+N+Pl+Gen: ибеˮ
     и+N+Pl+Dat: ихиˮ
     и+N+Pl+Loc: [ихиˮна, ихиˮня]
     и+N+Pl+Abl: ихит
     и+N+Pl+Pros: ибеˮмана
     
     и+N+Tra: иӈэ
     и+N+Car: исиˮ
     и+N+Equ: идремʼ
     и+N+Equ+Lat: идревʼ
     
# Possessive forms 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ив
     иˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: иˮл  
     иˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: [итя, ита] 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: иˮмиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: иˮлиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: итиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: иˮмаˮ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: иˮлаˮ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: итоʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: ив  
     иˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: ит  
     иˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: [итя, ита]  
     иˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: иˮмиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: итиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: итиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: иˮмаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: [итяˮ, итаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: идоʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: ин  
     иˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ит 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: [итя, ита]  
     иˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: иˮниʼ 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: итиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: итиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: иˮнаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: [итяˮ, итаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: итоʼ  
     иˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: ихин
     иˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: ихинд  
     иˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ихинда 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: ихиниʼ 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: ихиндиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: ихиндиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: ихинаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: ихиндаˮ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: ихиндоʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [ихинан, ихинян]   
     иˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: [ихинанд, ихинянд]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: ихинанда 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: ихинаниʼ 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: ихинандиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: ихинандиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ихинанаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: ихинандаˮ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ихинандоʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: ихидан   
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: ихидани  
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: ихиданд
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: ихиданда 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: ихиданиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: ихидандиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: ихидандиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: ихиданаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: ихидандаˮ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: ихидандоʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: ивнан   
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: ивнани  
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: [ивнанд, ивнянд]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: ивнанда 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: ивнаниʼ 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: ивнандиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: ивнандиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: ивнанаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: ивнандаˮ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: ивнандоʼ
     иˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: ихиюн  
     иˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: ихиюд  
     иˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: ихиюда 
     иˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: ихиюниʼ
     иˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: ихиюдиʼ
     иˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: ихиюдиʼ
     иˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: ихиюнаˮ
     иˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: ихиюдаˮ
     иˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: ихиюдоʼ
     иˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: ихиюн  
     иˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: ихиюд  
     иˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: ихиюда 
     иˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: ихиюниʼ
     иˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: ихиюдиʼ
     иˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: ихиюдиʼ
     иˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: ихиюнаˮ
     иˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: ихиюдаˮ
     иˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: ихиюдоʼ
     иˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: ихиюн  
     иˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: ихиют  
     иˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: ихиюта 
     иˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: ихиюниʼ
     иˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: ихиютиʼ
     иˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: ихиютиʼ
     иˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: ихиюнаˮ
     иˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: ихиютаˮ
     иˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: ихиютоʼ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ибен
     иˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ибед   
     иˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ибеда  
     иˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: ибениʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: ибедиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: ибедиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ибенаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: ибедаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: ибедоʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: ибени 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: ибед   
     иˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: ибеда  
     иˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: ибениʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: ибедиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: ибедиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: ибенаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: ибедаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: ибедоʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: ибеˮн  
     иˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: ибет   
     иˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ибета  
     иˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: ибеˮниʼ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: ибетиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: ибетиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: ибеˮнаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: ибетаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: ибетоʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: ихиˮн 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: ихит 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: ихита 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: ихиˮниʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: ихитиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: ихитиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: ихиˮнаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: ихитаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: ихитоʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: ихиˮнан  
     иˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: ихиˮнат
     иˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: ихиˮната 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: ихиˮнаниʼ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: ихиˮнатиʼ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: ихиˮнатиʼ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: ихиˮнанаˮ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: ихиˮнатаˮ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: ихиˮнатоʼ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: ихитан 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: ихитат 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: ихитата 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: ихитаниʼ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: ихитатиʼ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: ихитатиʼ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: ихитанаˮ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: ихитатаˮ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: ихитатоʼ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: ибеˮманан  
     иˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: ибеˮманат  
     иˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: ибеˮманата 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: ибеˮмананиʼ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: ибеˮманатиʼ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: ибеˮманатиʼ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: ибеˮмананаˮ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: ибеˮманатаˮ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: ибеˮманатоʼ

# Predestinative !Should be added
# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: идмʼ
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ин  
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: и
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: иниʼ
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: идиʼ
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ихиʼ
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: иваˮ
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: идаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: иˮ 
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: идамзь
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: инась 
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ись   
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: ининзь
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: идинзь
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ихинзь
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: иваць 
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: идаць  
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: иць  
